Maine, session 132, LD1764.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §8309 is enacted to read:
§8309. Staffing ratios; funding distribution
1. Staffing ratios. A center or region shall maintain a minimum staffing ratio as
follows:
A. At least one full-time employee for every 8 students enrolled for a center or region
with fewer than 1,000 students; and
B. At least one full-time employee for every 13 students enrolled for a center or region
with 1,000 or more students.
Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraphs A and B, a center or region may adopt a
staffing ratio appropriate to the industry standard applicable to the program offered by the
center or region, subject to the approval of the commissioner.
2. Funding distribution. Beginning in 2025, a center or region shall submit to the
department annually by September 30th a calculation of the difference between the funding
needed for the center or region to meet the staffing ratio requirements under subsection 1
and the funding received by the center or region for the previous fiscal year.
Beginning in 2025, the department shall distribute additional available funds to a center or
region by November 30th annually to meet the staffing requirements under subsection 1
based on the annual calculation submitted by that center or region, giving preference for
funding distribution to a center or region with fewer than 1,000 students.